test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-sueuemae77_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `süümä: # Verb (77) `süümä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     süümä+V+Inf/mA: süümä
     süümä+V+Inf: süvväq
     süümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: süü
     süümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [süüt, süüdeq]
     süümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [süü, sööse]
     süümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: söömiq
     süümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [süütiq, süüdeq]
     süümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: sööväq
     süümä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: süü
     süümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: süvvä
     süümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [süvvät, süvvädeq]
     süümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: süvväs
     süümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl1: süvvämiq
     süümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl2: süvvätiq
     süümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl3: süvväseq
     süümä+V+Pss+Ind+ConNegII: süvvä

     süümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [sei, seie]
     süümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [seit, seiet, seiq, seieq, seideq, seiedeq]
     süümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [sei, seie]
     süümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [seimiq, seiemiq]
     süümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [seitiq, seietiq]
     süümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [seiq, seieq, seiväq, seieväq]
     süümä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: süü
     süümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg1: süvvi
     süümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [süvvit, süvviq, süvvideq]
     süümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg3: süüdi
     süümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl1: süvvimiq
     süümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl2: süvvitiq
     süümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [süüdiq, süüdiväq]

     süümä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: süüvä
     süümä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen: süüvä
     süümä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Par: süüvät
     süümä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill: süüvähe
     süümä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: süüväq
     süümä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen: [süüvide, süüviide]
     süümä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Par: [süüvit, süüviid]
     süümä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill: [süüvihe, süüviihe]

     süümä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: süüdäv
     süümä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen: süüdävä
     süümä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Par: süüdävät
     süümä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill: süüdävähe
     süümä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: süüdäväq
     süümä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen: [süüdävide, süüdäviide]
     süümä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Par: [süüdävit, süüdäviid]
     süümä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill: [süüdävihe, süüdäviihe]

     süümä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: söönüq
     süümä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen: süünü
     süümä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Par: süünüt
     süümä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill: süünühe
     süümä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: süünüq
     süümä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen: [süünüide, süünüisi]
     süümä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Par: [süünüid, süünüisi]
     süümä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill: [süünüihe, süünüisihe]

     süümä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: [süüd, süüdü]
     süümä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen: süüdü
     süümä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Par: süüdüt
     süümä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill: süüdühe
     süümä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: süüdüq
     süümä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen: [süüdüide, süüdüisi]
     süümä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Par: [süüdüid, süüdüisi]
     süümä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill: [süüdüihe, süüdüisihe]
